North Dakota, session 69, HB1580.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. LEGISLATIVE MANAGEMENT STUDY - STATE EMPLOYEE COMPENSATION.
1. During the 2025-26 interim, the legislative management shall consider studying the classified
state employee total rewards compensation system, including a review of the development
and determination of pay grade, classifications, and health care benefits. The study must
include a review of:
a. The history of changes to classification and pay grade levels;
b. Comparisons among state employees across all departments and between state
employee compensation levels to similar private sector jobs;
c. The use of equity funding and bonuses to retain employees;
d. The payment of prevailing wages on state projects;
e. Wage levels in awarding contracts for state projects;
f. The impact of changes to health plan benefits; and
g. Premium rate structures for single and family coverage and the impact of any proposed
changes.
2. The legislative management shall report its findings and recommendations, together with any
legislation required to implement the recommendations, to the seventieth legislative assembly.

H. B. NO. 1580 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1580.
House Vote: Yeas 76 Nays 15 Absent 3
Senate Vote: Yeas 47 Nays 0 Absent 0
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State